Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.023

Filing articles of incorporation—Receipt of certificate of authority.

(1) The director shall present the articles of incorporation, after approval by the director, to the secretary of state for filing.

(2) An applicant is not authorized to commence and maintain business as a business development company under this chapter until having received a certificate of authority from the department to conduct business as a business development company.

[ 2006 c 87 s 4.]